California, session 20252026, AB817.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 69842 of the Government Code is amended to read:69842. (a) (1) The clerk of the superior court shall keep such indexes as will insure an index to ensure ready reference to any action or proceeding filed in the court. There shall be separate indexes indices of plaintiffs and defendants in civil actions and of defendants in criminal actions. The name of each plaintiff and defendant shall be indexed and there shall appear opposite each name indexed the number of the action or proceeding and the name or names of the adverse litigant or litigants.(2) Publicly accessible electronic indices of criminal cases shall allow searching the court’s electronic index by entering an individual’s name, date of birth, driver’s license, or any combination thereof. In return, the court index shall only provide records that match the identifiers entered. The results shall include the date of birth and driver’s license redacted and only indicate whether there is a match for the data entered.(3) All uses of court indices shall comply with the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).(b) A person authorized to receive public information pursuant to this section shall not be considered to have received local summary criminal history information as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 13300 of the Penal Code.SECTION 1.Section 19813 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19813.(a)The term of office of each member of the commission is four years.(b)The Governor shall appoint the members of the commission, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall designate one member to serve as chairperson. Vacancies shall be filled within 60 days of the date of the vacancy by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.(c)The Governor may remove a member of the commission for incompetence, neglect of duty, or corruption upon first giving the member a copy of the charges and an opportunity to be heard. The Governor shall notify the Legislature of the removal of a member of the commission.SEC. 2.Section 19883 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19883.(a)To the extent required by this chapter, officers and directors, shareholders, lenders, holders of evidence of indebtedness, underwriters, agents, or employees of a corporate owner licensee shall be licensed individually. The corporation shall require these persons to apply for a gambling license, and shall notify the department of every change of corporate officers, directors, or key employees within 10 business days after the change. An officer, director, or key employee who is required to apply for a license shall apply for the license within 30 calendar days after they become an officer, director, or key employee.(b)The corporation shall immediately remove an officer or director required to apply for a license from an office or directorship if any of the following apply to that officer or director:(1)They fail to apply for the license within 30 calendar days after becoming an officer or director.(2)They are denied a license.(3)Their license is revoked.(c)If the license of any officer or director is suspended, the corporation, immediately and for the duration of the suspension, shall suspend that officer or director.(d)If a shareholder who is required to apply for a gambling license fails to apply for the license within the time required, the shareholder shall be deemed to have been denied a license for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 19882.(e)If a person, other than an officer, director, or shareholder, who is required to apply for a gambling license fails to do so, the failure may be deemed to be a failure of the corporate owner licensee to require the application.